District of Columbia statutes.
16-3909

Award of costs.

In the action pursuant to this chapter, the award of costs is in the discretion of the judge, who may include therein the reasonable cost of bonds and undertakings, and other reasonable expenses incident to the action, incurred by either party.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 611, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-3909.
1973 Ed., § 16-3909.